dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.fat.dix
  <!-- marid; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/arid__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arid</l>
          <r>arid<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orda</l>
          <r>arid<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tanbur; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/anbur__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anbur</l>
          <r>anbur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nabar</l>
          <r>anbur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħuġġieġa; ħ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ħ/uġġieġa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uġġieġa</l>
          <r>uġġieġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ġejjeġ</l>
          <r>uġġieġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- somma; som; 2 -->
    <pardef n="som/ma__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- antikamra; antik; 2 -->
    <pardef n="antik/amra__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amra</l>
          <r>amra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mamar</l>
          <r>amra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sala; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/ala__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ala</l>
          <r>ala<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wali</l>
          <r>ala<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- fisqija; f; 2 -->
    <pardef n="f/isqija__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isqija</l>
          <r>isqija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sieqi</l>
          <r>isqija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- skuna; sk; 2 -->
    <pardef n="sk/una__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>una</l>
          <r>una<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejjen</l>
          <r>una<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- fossa; fos; 2 -->
    <pardef n="fos/sa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qalba; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/alba__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alba</l>
          <r>alba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lub</l>
          <r>alba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qasam; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/asam__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asam</l>
          <r>asam<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osma</l>
          <r>asam<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħodon; ħ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ħ/odon__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odon</l>
          <r>odon<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dan</l>
          <r>odon<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bhima; bh; 2 -->
    <pardef n="bh/ima__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>ima<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejjem</l>
          <r>ima<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żurżar; ż; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ż/urżar__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urżar</l>
          <r>urżar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rażar</l>
          <r>urżar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- mansab; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/ansab__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ansab</l>
          <r>ansab<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nasab</l>
          <r>ansab<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- skarpan; sk; 3 -->
    <pardef n="sk/arpan__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arpan</l>
          <r>arpan<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rapan</l>
          <r>arpan<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rapen</l>
          <r>arpan<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qotna; qot; 2 -->
    <pardef n="qot/na__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- senduq; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/enduq__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enduq</l>
          <r>enduq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niedaq</l>
          <r>enduq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xriek; x; 2 -->
    <pardef n="x/riek__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riek</l>
          <r>riek<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orok</l>
          <r>riek<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bużżieqa; b; 2 -->
    <pardef n="b/użżieqa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>użżieqa</l>
          <r>użżieqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>żieżaq</l>
          <r>użżieqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- lsien; ls; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ls/ien__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ien</l>
          <r>ien<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ina</l>
          <r>ien<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ftira; ft; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ft/ira__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ira</l>
          <r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajjar</l>
          <r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- gelgul; gel; 2 -->
    <pardef n="gel/gul__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gul</l>
          <r>gul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>glie</l>
          <r>gul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- nadif; n; 3 -->
    <pardef n="n/adif__adj_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adif</l>
          <r>adif<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>daf</l>
          <r>adif<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odfa</l>
          <r>adif<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="marid"><i>m</i><par n="m/arid__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tanbur"><i>t</i><par n="t/anbur__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħuġġieġa"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/uġġieġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="somma"><i>som</i><par n="som/ma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="antikamra"><i>antik</i><par n="antik/amra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sala"><i>s</i><par n="s/ala__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fisqija"><i>f</i><par n="f/isqija__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="skuna"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/una__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fossa"><i>fos</i><par n="fos/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qalba"><i>q</i><par n="q/alba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qasam"><i>q</i><par n="q/asam__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħodon"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/odon__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bhima"><i>bh</i><par n="bh/ima__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żurżar"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/urżar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mansab"><i>m</i><par n="m/ansab__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="skarpan"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/arpan__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qotna"><i>qot</i><par n="qot/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="senduq"><i>s</i><par n="s/enduq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xriek"><i>x</i><par n="x/riek__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bużżieqa"><i>b</i><par n="b/użżieqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lsien"><i>ls</i><par n="ls/ien__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ftira"><i>ft</i><par n="ft/ira__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gelgul"><i>gel</i><par n="gel/gul__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="nadif"><i>n</i><par n="n/adif__adj_GD"/></e>
